Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 1. Rates and Charges.

§§ 56-93 through 56-99.1.
Repealed by Acts 1996, cc. 114 and 157.

Editor’s note.

Sections 56-98 and 56-99 were also previously repealed by Acts 1970, c. 618.

§ 56-99.2.
Commission authority over rates, rules, classifications and practices of railroad companies.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Corporation Commission shall have the authority to administer and prescribe the rates, rules, classifications and practices of railroad companies exclusively in accordance with the provisions of Subtitle
IV of Title 49 of the United States Code, as amended by the Staggers Rail Act of 1980, Public Law 96-448. The Commission shall also have the authority to establish, by rule or regulation, standards and procedures to administer the
rates, rules, classifications and practices of railroad companies exclusively in accordance with federal law.

History.
1983, c. 443.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
15 M.J. Railroads, § 11.

§ 56-100.
Repealed by Acts 1970, c. 618.

§§ 56-100.1,
56-101.

Repealed by Acts 1996, cc. 114 and 157.

§ 56-102.
Unlawful to charge other than published tariff.

When rates, fares, and charges excluding those covered by contracts have been published in a tariff, it shall be unlawful for any such company to charge, demand, collect, or receive from any person a greater or less compensation for the transportation
of passengers or property, or for any services in connection therewith, than is specified in such published schedule of rates, fares, and charges, unless it is determined that a rate, fare or charge has been recorded in error.

History.
Code 1919, § 3910; 1979, c. 106; 1996, cc. 114, 157.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 114 and 157 are identical, and deleted “the Commission shall have either authorized or specified and published any such” preceding “rates,” inserted “excluding those covered by contracts have been published in a tariff” following
“charges,” substituted “unless it is determined” for “so authorized, or prescribed and published by the Commission, unless or until changed by the Commission; provided, however, when the Commission determines,” substituted “recorded”
for “published,” and deleted “it shall order publication of an appropriate correction which shall be effective from the effective date of the erroneous rate, fare or charge” following “error.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3B M.J. Carriers, §§ 23, 26; 15 M.J. Railroads, § 11.

§§ 56-102.1 through 56-110.
Repealed by Acts 1996, cc. 114 and 157.